Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.390

Quality management, accountability, and performance system—Independent assessment.

Starting in 2012, and at least once every three years thereafter, each agency shall apply to the Washington state quality award, or similar organization, for an independent assessment of its quality management, accountability, and performance system. The assessment shall evaluate the effectiveness of all elements of its management, accountability, and performance system, including: Leadership, strategic planning, customer focus, analysis and information, employee performance management, and process improvement. The purpose of the assessment is to recognize best practice and identify improvement opportunities.

[ 2009 c 564 s 931; 2005 c 384 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Findings—2005 c 384: See note following RCW 43.17.380.